Utah statutes.
31A-22-1806.   Penalties.

Notwithstanding Section 31A-2-308, if a vendor or the vendor's employee or authorized representative violate this part, the commissioner may do any of the following in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act:

(1)  impose a fine not to exceed:

(a) (i)  $2,500 per violation by a licensed individual; or

(ii)  $5,000 per violation by an entity; or

(b)  $40,000 in the aggregate for the conduct; or

(2)  impose other penalties that the commissioner considers necessary and reasonable to carry out the purpose of this part, including:

(a)  suspending or revoking the privilege of transacting portable electronics insurance pursuant to this part at a specific location where violations have occurred; and

(b)  suspending or revoking the ability of individual employees or authorized representatives to act under the vendor's limited lines license.

